Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 5. Rural Housing Projects.

§ 36-36.
Powers of county and regional housing authorities.

County housing authorities and regional housing authorities are specifically empowered and authorized to borrow money, accept grants and exercise their other powers to provide housing for farmers of low income. In connection with such projects, any such housing authority may enter into such leases or purchase agreements, accept such conveyances and rent or sell dwellings forming part of such projects to or for farmers of low income, as such housing authority deems necessary in order to assure the achievement of the objectives of this Housing Authorities Law. Such leases, agreements or conveyances may include such covenants as such housing authority deems appropriate regarding such dwellings and the tracts of land described in any such instrument, which covenants shall be deemed to run with the land where such housing authority deems it necessary and the parties to such instruments so stipulate. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting any other powers conferred by this Housing Authorities Law.

History.

1942, p. 322; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(4h).

§ 36-37.
Same subject; tenant selection limitations; homestead exemption.

A regional or county housing authority shall have power to rent, sell, or make loans to finance the cost of dwellings on farms or in other areas outside of cities and to make or accept such conveyances or leases as it deems necessary to carry out the rural housing purposes of this chapter. With respect to such housing, county and regional housing authorities shall not be subject to the tenant selection limitations provided in clause (c) of §

36-22

.

When an authority provides a dwelling on a farm hereunder, the owner of the farm living in the dwelling under a lease or purchase agreement shall be entitled to receive the same homestead exemption as if he had title to the dwelling.

History.

1946, p. 277; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(4p).

§ 36-38.
Housing applications by farmers.

The owner of any farm operated, or worked upon, by farmers of low income in need of safe and sanitary housing may file an application with a county housing authority or a regional housing authority requesting that it provide for a safe and sanitary dwelling or dwellings for occupancy by such farmers of low income. Such applications shall be received and examined by such housing authorities in connection with the formulation of projects or programs to provide housing for farmers of low income.

History.

1942, p. 323; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(4i).

§ 36-39.
Repealed by Acts 2006, c. 784, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-39

, which defined “farmers of low income,” was derived from Michie Code 1942, § 3145(4j); 1946, p. 277.